Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB316.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 381.190 is amended to read as follows:
A[No] sale of real estate by a trustee, by virtue of a pledge or deed of trust to secure the
payment of debts, shall not be valid or pass the title of the property specified in the deed
or pledge, unless:
(1) The sale is pursuant[in pursuance] to a judgment of a court;[, or ]
(2) Is made by an assignee under a voluntary deed of assignment;[,] or[ unless ]
(3) The maker of the deed or pledge joins in a writing evidencing the sale.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 3/2/2026 11:16 AM Jacketed